sv: Inlärningsläge för leksakstangentbord: App-assisterat lärande; Följa med-låtar; Fri lek; Guidade lektioner; Upplysta tangenter; Inspelning och uppspelning; Rytm-/spelläge; Övrigt
en: Toy keyboard learning mode: App-assisted learning; Follow-along songs; Free play; Guided lessons; Light-up keys; Recording & playback; Rhythm/game mode; Other
hu: Játék szintetizátor tanulási módja: Alkalmazástámogatott tanulás; Dalkísérés; Szabad játék; Vezetett leckék; Világító billentyűk; Felvétel és lejátszás; Ritmus/játék mód; Egyéb
hr-HR: Način učenja sa tipkovnicom igračkom: Učenje uz pomoć aplikacije; Pjesme za praćenje; Slobodna igra; Vođene lekcije; Svjetleće tipke; Snimanje i reprodukcija; Način ritma/igre; Ostalo
el: Λειτουργία εκμάθησης παιχνιδιού πληκτρολογίου: Εκμάθηση με υποστήριξη εφαρμογής; Τραγούδια για συνοδεία; Ελεύθερο παιχνίδι; Καθοδηγούμενα μαθήματα; Φωτιζόμενα πλήκτρα; Ηχογράφηση & αναπαραγωγή; Λειτουργία ρυθμού/παιχνιδιού; Άλλο
lt-LT: Žaislinio klavišinio instrumento mokymosi režimas: Mokymasis naudojant programėlę; Išmokstamos dainos; Laisvas grojimas; Vadovaujamos pamokos; Šviečiantys klavišai; Įrašymas ir atkūrimas; Ritmo / žaidimo režimas; Kita
nb: Læringsmodus for lekekeyboard: App-støttet læring; Følg med-sanger; Fri lek; Guidede leksjoner; Lysende tangenter; Opptak og avspilling; Rytme-/spillmodus; Annet
tr: Oyuncak klavye öğrenme modu: Uygulama destekli öğrenme; Eşlik edilebilir şarkılar; Serbest çalma; Rehberli dersler; Işıklı tuşlar; Kayıt ve oynatma; Ritim/oyun modu; Diğer
da: Læringstilstand for legetøjsklaver: App-understøttet læring; Spil med-sange; Frit spil; Guidede lektioner; Lysende tangenter; Optagelse og afspilning; Rytme-/spiltilstand; Andet
fr: Mode d’apprentissage du clavier jouet: Apprentissage assisté par appli; Chansons d’accompagnement; Jeu libre; Leçons guidées; Touches lumineuses; Enregistrement et lecture; Mode rythme/jeu; Autre
sk-SK: Režim učenia na detskej klávesnici: Výučba pomocou aplikácie; Sprievodné piesne; Voľná hra; Riadené lekcie; Svietiace klávesy; Nahrávanie a prehrávanie; Režim rytmu/hry; Iné
pt-BR: Teclado de brinquedo modo de aprendizagem: Aprendizado com a ajuda de app; Músicas para acompanhar; Toque livre; Lições guiadas; Teclas luminosas; Gravação e reprodução; Modo de ritmo/jogo; Outros
fi: Lelukosketinsoittimen oppimistila: Sovellusavusteinen oppiminen; Mukana soitettavat kappaleet; Vapaa soitto; Ohjatut oppitunnit; Valaistut koskettimet; Tallennus ja toisto; Rytmi-/pelitila; Muu
ko: 장난감 키보드 학습 방식: 앱 지원 학습; 노래 따라 부르기; 자유 연주; 가이드 레슨; 점등 키; 녹음 및 재생; 리듬/게임 모드; 기타
th: โหมดการเรียนรู้คีย์บอร์ดของเล่น: การเรียนรู้ผ่านแอป; เพลงสำหรับเล่นตาม; เล่นอิสระ; บทเรียนแบบมีคำแนะนำ; แป้นพิมพ์มีไฟ; บันทึกและเล่นซ้ำ; จังหวะ/โหมดเกม; อื่นๆ
cs: Způsob učení podporovaný klávesnicí na hraní: Učení pomocí aplikace; Písně pro doprovázení; Volná hra; Vedené lekce; Svítící klávesy; Nahrávání a přehrávání; Režim rytmu / hry; Jiné
sl-SI: Način učenja na igralni klaviaturi: Učenje s pomočjo aplikacije; Pesmi za igranje ob spremljavi; Prosto igranje; Vodene lekcije; Svetleče tipke; Snemanje in predvajanje; Ritem / način igre; Drugo
nl: Speelgoedkeyboard leermodus: App-ondersteund leren; Meespeelliedjes; Vrij spelen; Begeleide lessen; Oplichtende toetsen; Opnemen en afspelen; Ritmiek-/spelmodus; Overig
bg-BG: Режим на обучение на детски клавир: Обучение, подпомагано от приложение; Песни за съпровод; Свободна игра; Уроци с ръководство; Светещи клавиши; Запис и възпроизвеждане; Режим на ритъм/игра; Друго
ru: Режим обучения игрушечной клавиатуры: Обучение через приложение; Песни для повторения; Свободная игра; Уроки с подсказками; Подсвечивающиеся клавиши; Запись и воспроизведение; Режим ритма/игры; Другое
de: Lernmodus des Spielzeugkeyboards: App-gestütztes Lernen; Lieder zum Mitspielen; Freies Spielen; Geführte Lektionen; Leuchtende Tasten; Aufnahme & Wiedergabe; Rhythmus-/Spielmodus; Sonstiges
vi: Chế độ học tập bàn phím đồ chơi: Học tập có ứng dụng hỗ trợ; Hát theo bài hát; Chơi tự do; Bài học có hướng dẫn; Phím phát sáng; Ghi âm và phát lại; Chế độ nhịp điệu/trò chơi; Khác
zh-TW: 玩具鍵盤學習模式: app 輔助學習; 跟彈歌曲; 自由演奏; 引導課程; 發光琴鍵; 錄音與播放; 節奏/遊戲模式; 其他
ro-RO: Mod de învățare al orgii de jucărie: Învățare asistată de app; Melodii de acompaniament; Joacă liberă; Lecții ghidate; Taste luminoase; Înregistrare și redare; Mod ritm/joc; Altele
zh-CN: 玩具键盘学习模式: 应用辅助学习; 跟弹歌曲; 自由演奏; 指导课程; 发光琴键; 录音和回放; 节奏/游戏模式; 其他
pt-PT: Modo de aprendizagem do teclado de brinquedo: Aprendizagem assistida por app; Músicas para acompanhar; Reprodução livre; Lições orientadas; Teclas iluminadas; Gravação e reprodução; Ritmo/modo de jogo; Outro
pl: Tryb nauki zabawkowego keyboardu: Nauka ze wsparciem aplikacji; Piosenki z przewodnikiem; Swobodna gra; Lekcje z przewodnikiem; Podświetlane klawisze; Nagrywanie i odtwarzanie; Tryb rytmiczny/gry; Inne
es: Modo de aprendizaje del teclado de juguete: Aprendizaje asistido por app; Canciones para seguir; Juego libre; Lecciones guiadas; Teclas luminosas; Grabación y reproducción; Modo de ritmo/juego; Otro
ja: おもちゃのキーボード学習モード: アプリ連動学習; フォローアロングソング; フリープレイ; ガイド付きレッスン; 光る鍵盤; 録音 & 再生; リズム / ゲームモード; その他
it: Modalità di apprendimento della tastiera giocattolo: Apprendimento assistito da app; Canzoni da seguire; Gioco libero; Lezioni guidate; Tasti luminosi; Registrazione e riproduzione; Modalità ritmo/gioco; Altro